Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-319 Contingent liability as asset.
Any contingent liability to assessment of members of a domestic mutual insurer
does not constitute an asset of the insurer in any determination of its
financial condition. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next